Washington statutes.
RCW 24.36.110

Stock associations—Classified shares—Statement in articles.

If the shares are to be classified, the articles shall contain a description of the classes of shares and a statement of the number of shares of each kind or class and the nature and extent of the preferences, rights, privileges and restrictions granted to or imposed upon the holders of the respective classes of stock.

[ 1959 c 312 s 11.]